Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3303
Accredited school of veterinary medicine, defined.

Accredited school of veterinary medicine means:

(1) One approved by the board;

(2) A veterinary college or division of a university or college that offers the degree of Doctor of Veterinary Medicine or its equivalent; and

(3) One that conforms to the standards required for accreditation by the American Veterinary Medical Association.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1085.